DI-405
DIAGNOSTICS - VARIABLE GEAR RATIO STEERING

DIASI-01

DTC C1554 / 54 Power Source Relay Failure

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

When the VGRS ECU detects a malfunction in the power supply relay (located inside the VGRS ECU), the
ECU turns on the warning light, records the DTC, and stops VGRS operation.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

The system detects a malfunction of the power source relay or | « VGRS Fuse

C1554/54
4 an open circuit. VGRS ECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check the voltage between terminals PIG and PGND of the VGRS ECU connec-

tor.
PREPARATION:
ON Record and clear VGRS DTCs.
PGND —()— PIG CHECK:

Start the engine and measure the voltage between terminals

f o — L PIG and PGND of VGRS ECU.
(% % }”H” hiss A 9t0 16V

|
|
X Y =1 S B Below 9 V
4 ; ﬁ : \ Above 16 V

C
F17297
B > Check and repair harness and VGRS fuse.
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Check and repair charging system.

2 Check VGRS for DTC C1554/54.

Is DTC C1551/54 present?

@

No fault detected.

YES> Replace VGRS ECU.

NOTICE:
Fault may be intermittent. Check harness and connectors carefully and retest.
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